Virginia statutes. Title 56. Public Service Companies.
Article 1. In General.

§ 56-1.
Definitions.

Whenever used in this title, unless the context requires a different meaning:

“Broadband connection,” for purposes of this section, means a connection where transmission speeds exceed 200 kilobits per second in at least one direction.

“Commission” means the State Corporation Commission.

“Corporation” or

“company”
includes all corporations created by acts of the General Assembly of Virginia, or under the general incorporation laws of this Commonwealth, or doing business therein, and shall exclude all municipal corporations, other
political subdivisions, and public institutions owned or controlled by the Commonwealth.

“Electric vehicle charging service” means the replenishment of the battery of a plug-in electric motor vehicle, which replenishment occurs by plugging the motor vehicle into an electric power source in order to charge or recharge its battery.

“Interexchange telephone service” means telephone service between points in two or more exchanges that is not classified as local exchange telephone service. “Interexchange telephone service” shall not include Voice-over-Internet protocol service for
purposes of regulation by the Commission, including the imposition of certification processing fees and other administrative requirements, and the filing or approval of tariffs. Nothing herein shall be construed to either mandate or
prohibit the payment of switched network access rates or other intercarrier compensation, if any, related to Voice-over-Internet protocol service.

“Local exchange telephone service” means telephone service provided in a geographical area established for the administration of communication services and consists of one or more central offices together with associated facilities which are used in providing
local exchange service. Local exchange service, as opposed to interexchange service, consists of telecommunications between points within an exchange or between exchanges which are within an area where customers may call at specified
rates and charges. “Local exchange telephone service” shall not include Voice-over-Internet protocol service for purposes of regulation by the Commission, including the imposition of certification processing fees and other administrative
requirements, and the filing or approval of tariffs. Nothing herein shall be construed to either mandate or prohibit the payment of switched network access rates or other intercarrier compensation, if any, related to Voice-over-Internet
protocol service.

“Mail” includes electronic mail and other forms of electronic communication when the customer has requested or authorized electronic bill delivery or other electronic communications.

“Municipality” or

“municipal corporation”
shall include an authority created by a governmental unit exempt from the referendum requirement of §

15.2-5403

.

“Person” includes individuals, partnerships, limited liability companies, and corporations.

“Plug-in electric motor vehicle” means an on-road motor vehicle that draws propulsion using a traction battery that has at least four kilowatt hours of capacity, uses an external source of electric energy to charge or recharge the battery, has a gross
vehicle weight of not more than 14,000 pounds, and meets any applicable emissions standards.

“Public service corporation” or

“public service company”
includes gas, pipeline, electric light, heat, power and water supply companies, sewer companies, telephone companies, and all persons authorized to transport passengers or property as a common carrier. “Public service corporation”
or “public service company” shall not include (i) a municipal corporation, other political subdivision or public institution owned or controlled by the Commonwealth; however, if such an entity has obtained a certificate to provide
services pursuant to § 56-265.4:4, then such entity shall be deemed to be a public service corporation or public service company and subject to the authority of the Commission with respect only to its provision of the services it is
authorized to provide pursuant to such certificate; or (ii) any company described in subdivision (b)(10) of § 56-265.1.

“Railroad” includes all railroad or railway lines, whether operated by steam, electricity, or other motive power, except when otherwise specifically designated.

“Railroad company” includes any company, trustee or other person owning, leasing or operating a railroad.

“Rate” means rate charged for any service rendered or to be rendered.

“Rate,” “charge” and

“regulation”
include joint rates, joint charges and joint regulations, respectively.

“Regulated operating revenue” includes only revenue from services not found to be competitive.

“Transportation company” includes any railroad company, any company transporting express by railroad, and any ship or boat company.

“Virginia limited liability company” has the same meaning ascribed to “limited liability company” in §

13.1-1002

. A foreign limited liability company, as that term is defined in §

13.1-1002

, may become a Virginia limited liability company, even though also being a limited liability company organized under laws other than the laws of the Commonwealth, by filing articles of organization that meet the requirements
of §§

13.1-1003

and

13.1-1011

and include (i) the name of the foreign limited liability company immediately prior to the filing of the articles of organization; (ii) the date on which and the jurisdiction in which the foreign limited liability company
was first formed, organized, created or otherwise came into being; and (iii) the jurisdiction that constituted the seat, siege social, or principal place of business or central administration of the foreign limited liability company,
or any equivalent thereto under applicable law, immediately prior to the filing of the articles of organization. With respect to a foreign limited liability company that is also organized as a Virginia limited liability company, the
terms and conditions of its organization as a Virginia limited liability company shall be approved in the manner provided for by the document, instrument, agreement or other writing, as the case may be, governing the internal affairs
of the foreign limited liability company in the conduct of its business or by applicable law other than the law of the Commonwealth, as appropriate.

“Voice-over-Internet protocol service” or

“VoIP service”
means any service that: (i) enables real-time, two-way voice communications that originate or terminate from the user’s location using Internet protocol or any successor protocol and (ii) uses a broadband connection from
the user’s location. This definition includes any such service that permits users generally to receive calls that originate on the public switched telephone network and to terminate calls to the public switched telephone network.

History.
Code 1919, §§ 3693, 3881; 1971, Ex. Sess., c. 23; 1984, c. 382; 2002, cc. 479, 489; 2004, c. 1028; 2006, cc. 691, 912, 929, 941; 2007, c. 619; 2009, c. 746; 2011, cc. 408, 738, 740; 2016, c. 288.

Cross references.

For definition of a “public utility,” see § 56-232.

For definition of other terms pertaining to corporations, see §

13.1-603

and Va. Const., Art. IX.

As to conduct prohibited by the General Assembly Conflicts of Interest Act, see § 30-103.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2016, c. 288, cl. 3 provides: “That the provisions of this act shall not affect the validity of any filing made, or other action taken, before the effective date of this act with respect to (i) the conversion of a domestic or foreign partnership
or limited partnership to a limited liability company or (ii) the domestication of a non-United States entity as a limited liability company.”

The 2002 amendments.

The 2002 amendments by cc. 479 and 489 are identical, and in the definition of “public service corporation,” deleted “and shall exclude all municipal corporation, other political subdivisions, and public institutions owned or controlled by the Commonwealth”
at the end of the first sentence, and added the final sentence.

The 2004 amendments.

The 2004 amendment by c. 1028 added the paragraph defining “Virginia limited liability company.”

The 2006 amendments.

The 2006 amendment by c. 691 rewrote the section.

The 2006 amendment by c. 912, in the first sentence of the definition of “Virginia limited liability company,” inserted clause (ii), redesignated former clause (ii) as clause (iii) and made related changes, and combined the former second and last sentences
by substituting “and the” for “The” and in the second sentence, substituted “With respect to an organization or domestication pursuant to clause (iii), the” for “The” and deleted “of a foreign limited liability company as a limited
liability company” preceding “shall be approved” and deleted “in accordance with this process” at the end of the last sentence; and inserted “limited liability companies” in the definition of “Person.”

The 2006 amendments by cc. 929 and 941 are identical, and inserted the paragraph defining “municipality.”

The definition of “Virginia limited liability company” has been set out in the form above at the direction of the Virginia Code Commission.

The 2007 amendments.

The 2007 amendment by c. 619, in the first sentence of the definition of “Voice-over-Internet service” or “VolP service,” inserted “that originate or terminate from the user’s location using Internet protocol or any succesor protocol and” in clause (i);
substituted “uses” for “requires” in clause (ii); deleted clause (iii) and the clause (iv) designation and added “This definition includes any such service that” at the beginning of the last sentence.

The 2009 amendments.

The 2009 amendment by c. 746, in the paragraph defining “Public service corporation,” added the clause (i) designator and added clause (ii).

The 2011 amendments.

The 2011 amendment by c. 408 added the definitions for “Electric vehicle charging service” and “Plug-in electric motor vehicle.”

The 2011 amendments by cc. 738 and 740 are identical, and, in the sixth paragraph, inserted “specified” preceding “rates and charges” and deleted “specified in local exchange tariffs filed with the Commission” thereafter; and added the seventh paragraph
defining “Mail”; deleted “telegraph companies” following “telephone companies” in the first sentence of the definition of “Public service corporation”; and added definition of “Regulated operating revenue.”

The 2016 amendments.

The 2016 amendment by c. 288 rewrote the definition of “Virginia limited liability company.”

Law Review.

For survey of Virginia law on municipal corporations and administrative law for the year 1970-1971, see 57 Va. L. Rev. 1572 (1971).

For an article, “Disentangling Deregulatory Takings,” see 86 Va. L. Rev. 1435 (2000).

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see
3B M.J. Carriers, § 23; 7A M.J. Eminent Domain, § 11; 15 M.J. Public Service and State Corporation Commissions, §§ 2, 21; 15 M.J. Railroads, § 11.

§ 56-1.1.
Designation as public service corporation.

The State Corporation Commission may designate a business enterprise operating as a telephone or telecommunications company to be a public service corporation when, upon appropriate inquiry and public hearing, the Commission determines that the enterprise
is engaged in any of the public utility services described in § 56-1. However, this section shall not apply to any mutual telephone association existing prior to January 1, 1984.

History.
1984, c. 648.

§ 56-1.2.
Persons, localities, and school boards not designated as public utility, public service corporation, etc.

The terms public utility, public service corporation, or public service company, as used in Chapters 1 (§ 56-1 et seq.), 10 (§ 56-232 et seq.), 10.1 (§ 56-265.1 et seq.), and 10.2:1 (§ 56-265.13:1 et seq.) of this title, shall not refer to:

Any person who owns or operates property and provides electricity, natural gas, water, or sewer service to residents or tenants on the property, provided that (i) the electricity, natural gas, water, or sewer service provided to the residents or tenants
is purchased by the person from a public utility, public service corporation, public service company, or person licensed by the Commission as a competitive provider of energy services, or a county, city or town, or other publicly
regulated political subdivision or public body, (ii) the person or his agent charges to the resident or tenant on the property only that portion of the person’s utility charges for the electricity, natural gas, water, or sewer
service which is attributable to usage by the resident or tenant on the property, and additional service charges permitted by §

55.1-1212

or

55.1-1404

, as applicable, and (iii) the person maintains three years’ billing records for such charges.

Any (i) person who is not a public service corporation and who provides electric vehicle charging service at retail, (ii) school board that operates retail fee-based electric vehicle charging stations on school property pursuant to § 22.1-131, or (iii)
locality that operates a retail fee-based electric vehicle charging station on property owned or leased by the locality pursuant to §

15.2-967.2

. The ownership or operation of a facility at which electric vehicle charging service is sold, and the selling of electric vehicle charging service from that facility, does not render such person, school board, locality,
or board of visitors a public utility, public service corporation, or public service company as used in Chapters 1 (§ 56-1 et seq.), 10 (§ 56-232 et seq.), 10.1 (§ 56-265.1 et seq.), and 10.2:1 (§ 56-265.13:1 et seq.) solely because
of that sale, ownership, or operation.

Any agency, as defined in §

2.2-128

, when operating a retail fee-based electric vehicle charging station pursuant to §

2.2-614.5

on any property or facility the agency controls. The ownership or operation of a facility at which electric vehicle charging service is sold, or the selling of electric vehicle charging service from that facility,
does not render the agency a public utility, public service corporation, or public service company as used in Chapters 1 (§ 56-1 et seq.), 10 (§ 56-232 et seq.), 10.1 (§ 56-265.1 et seq.), and 10.2:1 (§ 56-265.13:1 et seq.) solely
because of that sale, ownership, or operation.

History.
1993, c. 265; 1999, c. 778; 2000, c. 994; 2003, c. 355; 2011, c. 408; 2017, c. 239; 2018, cc. 295, 446; 2019, c. 248; 2020, c. 490.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2018, cc. 295 and 446, cl. 2 provides: “That the provisions of this act shall apply to any electric vehicle charging station existing prior to the effective date of this act [July 1, 2018] that is otherwise in compliance with the requirements of
this act.”

To conform to the recodification of Title 55 by Acts 2019, c. 712, effective October 1, 2019, the following substitution was made at the direction of the Virginia Code Commission: substituted “§

55.1-1212

or

55.1-1404

, as applicable” for “§ 55-226.2.”

The 1999 amendment
inserted “electricity, natural gas or” preceding “water” throughout the section, deleted “and” following “public body” in clause (i), substituted “56-245.3, and” for “55-248.45:1” in clause (ii), and added clause (iii).

The 2000 amendments.

The 2000 amendment by c. 994, in the introductory language, inserted “this” and deleted “56” near the beginning, and inserted the language beginning “or person licensed” and ending “services, or a” near the middle.

The 2003 amendments.

The 2003 amendment by c. 355, inserted “or sewer service” three times, and substituted “attributable to usage by the resident or tenant on the property, and additional service charges permitted by § 55-226.2” for “permitted by § 56-245.3.”

The 2011 amendments.

The 2011 amendment by c. 408 subdivided the existing provisions of the section, creating introductory language and the subdivision 1 designation; and added subdivision 2.

The 2017 amendments.

The 2017 amendment by c. 239, in subdivision 2, inserted the clause (i) designation and inserted clause (ii), and made a related change in the first sentence, and substituted “such person or school board” for “the person” in the second sentence.

The 2018 amendments.

The 2018 amendments by cc. 295 and 446 are identical, and in subdivision 2, added clauses (iii) and (iv) in the first sentence and inserted “locality, or board of visitors” in the second sentence; and added subdivisions 3 and 4; and made stylistic changes.
For applicability, see Editor’s note.

The 2019 amendments.

The 2019 amendment by c. 248 added subdivision 5 and made a stylistic change.

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendment by c. 490, in subdivision 2, deleted clause (iv) in the first sentence, which read: “board of visitors of any baccalaureate public institution of higher education that operates a retail fee-based electric vehicle charging station on
the grounds of such institution pursuant to §

23.1-1301.1

”; in subdivision 3, rewrote the first sentence, which read: “The Department of Conservation and Recreation when operating a retail fee-based electric vehicle charging station on property of any existing state park or
similar recreational facility the Department controls pursuant to § 10.1-104.01” and substituted “agency” for “Department of Conservation and Recreation” in the second sentence; deleted subdivision 4, pertaining to the Chancellor of
the Virginia Community College System; and deleted subdivision 5, pertaining to the Department of General Services, Department of Motor Vehicles, and Department of Transportation.

§ 56-1.2:1.
Retail sale of electricity in connection with the provision of electric vehicle charging service.

The provision of electric vehicle charging service by a person, locality, park authority created by a locality pursuant to §

15.2-5702

, school board, or any agency as defined in §

2.2-128

that is not a public utility, public service corporation, or public service company shall not constitute the retail sale of electricity if:

The electricity furnished in connection with the provision of electric vehicle charging service is used solely for transportation purposes; and

The person, locality, park authority created by a locality pursuant to §

15.2-5702

, school board, or agency as defined in §

2.2-128

providing the electric vehicle charging service has procured the furnished electricity from the public utility that is authorized by the Commission to engage in the retail sale of electricity within the
exclusive service territory in which the electric vehicle charging service is provided.

The provision of electric vehicle charging service shall:

Be a permitted electric utility activity of a certificated electric utility; and

Not affect the status as a public utility of a certificated public utility that provides such service.

History.
2011, c. 408; 2017, c. 239; 2018, cc. 295, 446; 2019, c. 248; 2020, c. 490; 2022, c. 255.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2018, cc. 295 and 446, cl. 2 provides: “That the provisions of this act shall apply to any electric vehicle charging station existing prior to the effective date of this act [July 1, 2018] that is otherwise in compliance with the requirements of
this act.”

The 2017 amendments.

The 2017 amendment by c. 239 inserted “or school board” in the introductory language of subsection A and subdivision A 2, and made a minor stylistic change.

The 2018 amendments.

The 2018 amendments by cc. 295 and 446 are identical, and in subsection A, inserted “locality, public institution of higher education” and “or by the Department of Conservation and Recreation” or similar language in the introductory paragraph and in subdivision
2; and made stylistic changes. For applicability, see Editor’s note.

The 2019 amendments.

The 2019 amendment by c. 248 inserted “Department of General Services, Department of Motor Vehicles, or Department of Transportation” twice in subsection A; and made stylistic changes.

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendment by c. 490, in subsection A in the introductory language, substituted “locality, school board, or any agency as defined in §

2.2-128

” for “locality, public institution of higher education, or a school board” and deleted “or by the Department of Conservation and Recreation, Department of General Services, Department of Motor Vehicles, or Department
of Transportation” following “public service company”; and made similar changes in subdivision A 2.

The 2022 amendments.

The 2022 amendment by c. 255 inserted “park authority created by a locality pursuant to §

15.2-5702

” in the introductory paragraph of subsection A and subdivision A 2.

§ 56-1.3.
Regulation of Voice-over-Internet protocol service.

Notwithstanding any provision of law, except §

58.1-1730

, to the contrary:

“Telecommunications service” and “telephone service” shall not include the provision of Voice-over-Internet protocol service for purposes of regulation by the Commission.

The Commission shall not have jurisdiction with respect to the regulation of Voice-over-Internet protocol service, including but not limited to the imposition of regulatory fees, certification requirements, and the filing or approval of tariffs.

Nothing herein shall be construed to either mandate or prohibit the payment of switched network access rates or other intercarrier compensation, if any, related to Voice-over-Internet protocol service, as may be determined by the Commission.

History.
2006, c. 691; 2018, cc. 532, 533.

The 2018 amendments.

The 2018 amendments by cc. 532 and 533 are identical, and in the introductory paragraph, deleted “§ 56-484.12:1 and” preceding “58.1-1730.”

§ 56-2.
Public service corporations, etc., governed by provisions of this title.

Every public service corporation heretofore or hereafter incorporated and authorized to construct, maintain, or operate, in this Commonwealth, any work of public service, and every association, person, or partnership constructing, maintaining, or operating
any such work, shall be governed by the provisions of this title and Title 13.1, so far as they apply to such corporations, associations, persons, and partnerships, as well as by any laws that may hereafter be enacted relating to such
corporations.

History.
Code 1919, § 3900.

Cross references.

For constitutional provisions relating to foreign public service corporations, see Va. Const., Art. IX, § 5.

§ 56-3.
Expenses prior to organization.

The expenses incurred prior to the organization of any public service corporation, for preliminary surveys, or for stationery or advertising, or any other necessary matter or thing, may, if deemed reasonable by the president and directors, be paid by
their order.

History.
Code 1919, § 3901.

§ 56-4.
Repealed by Acts 1954, c. 188.

§ 56-5.
Triple damages for injury to property of public service corporation.

Any person who shall wilfully destroy, injure, or obstruct any of the works or property of a public service corporation shall be liable to such corporation for three times the amount of the actual damage thereby sustained. This section shall not relieve
such person of any liability to criminal prosecution for such offense, or of any fine or imprisonment imposed by law therefor.

History.
Code 1919, § 3894.

Cross references.

For offenses relating to railroads and other utilities, see §§

18.2-153

through

18.2-167.1

.

§ 56-5.1.
Repealed by Acts 2005, c. 35.

Editor’s note.

Former § 56-5.1, pertaining to failure or refusal to obey Commission orders concerning natural gas companies, derived from 1989, c. 211.

§ 56-6.
Remedies of persons aggrieved by public service corporation’s violation of law.

Any person or corporation aggrieved by anything done or omitted in violation of any of the provisions of this or any other chapter under this title, by any public service corporation chartered or doing business in this Commonwealth, shall have the right
to make complaint of the grievance and seek relief by petition against such public service corporation before the State Corporation Commission, sitting as a court of record. If the grievance complained of be established, the Commission,
sitting as a court of record, shall have jurisdiction, by injunction, to restrain such public service corporation from continuing the same, and to enjoin obedience to the requirements of this law, and the Commission, sitting as a court
of record, shall also have jurisdiction, by mandamus, to compel any public service corporation to observe and perform any public duty imposed upon public service corporations by the laws of this Commonwealth, subject as to any matter
arising under this section to the right of appeal to the Supreme Court by either party as of right in the mode prescribed by law; but nothing in this section shall be construed to confer any power upon the Commission which is forbidden
to the courts by § 56-429.

History.
Code 1919, § 3902.

Cross references.

For constitutional powers of the State Corporation Commission, see Va. Const., Art. IX, § 2.

Research References.

Friend’s Virginia Pleading and Practice (Matthew Bender). Chapter 33 Writs and Injunctions. § 33.02 Injunctions. Friend.

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see
7A M.J. Eminent Domain, § 26.

§ 56-7.
Common law, etc., remedies not altered or abridged.

Nothing contained in this title shall in any way abridge or alter existing remedies at common law or under any other statute, but the new remedies given shall be deemed to be in addition to those already existing.

History.
Code 1919, § 3903.

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see
3C M.J. Commercial Law, § 2.

§ 56-8.
Repeal of charter.

The charter of every public service corporation heretofore or hereafter incorporated may be repealed by any future General Assembly; but no law shall be passed for taking from a company its works or property without making to it just compensation.

History.
Code 1919, § 3891.

§ 56-8.1.
Free services to members of General Assembly and others prohibited.

No public service corporation doing business in this Commonwealth shall grant to any member of the General Assembly or to any state, county, district, or municipal officer any free pass, free transportation, or any rebate or reduction in the rates charged
by such corporation to the general public. Any public service corporation violating this section and any person receiving any privilege or benefit prohibited by this section shall be guilty of a misdemeanor, and upon conviction thereof,
shall each be fined an amount not to exceed $1,000 for each such offense. This section shall not be construed to prevent any public service corporation from granting free transportation, services or free passes to any person including
those set forth herein who would by virtue of their employment or service as an officer, director or otherwise be entitled thereto, or to members of any police force or fire department while in the discharge of their official duties.

History.
1971, Ex. Sess., c. 9.

§ 56-8.2.
Appeals in rate cases.

Any public service corporation which is required by law to file a schedule of rates with the Commission, or the Commonwealth, or any other party in interest or party aggrieved may appeal to the Supreme Court from any final decision or order of the Commission
concerning such rates. Upon the granting of such appeal, the Supreme Court may award or refuse a writ of supersedeas, and, if a writ of supersedeas be awarded, it may suspend the operation of the action appealed from in whole or in
part. Alternatively, the Supreme Court in its discretion may authorize putting into effect of the schedule of rates so filed and suspended by the Commission or the schedule of rates existing at the time of the filing of the schedule
upon which the investigation and hearing have been had, or require the inauguration of the schedule of rates as ordered by the Commission, until the final disposition of the appeal. But, prior to the final reversal by the Supreme Court
of the order appealed to the Supreme Court, no action of the Commission prescribing or affecting rates or charges shall be delayed, or suspended in its operation, by reason of any appeal by the party whose rates or charges are affected,
or by reason of any proceeding resulting from such appeal until a suspending bond payable to the Commonwealth has been executed and filed with the Commission with such conditions, in such penalty, and with such surety thereon as the
Commission, subject to review by the Supreme Court, may deem sufficient. In any appeal from action of the Commission prescribing or affecting the rates or charges of a public service corporation, such bond, or if no bond is required,
the order of the Supreme Court, shall expressly provide for the prompt refunding to the parties entitled thereto of all charges which may have been collected or received, pending the appeal, in excess of those fixed, or authorized
by the final decision on appeal, with interest from the date of the collection thereon. But no bond shall be required of the Commonwealth. Any bond required under this section shall be enforced in the name of the Commonwealth before
the Commission or before any court having jurisdiction, and the process and proceedings thereon shall be as provided by law upon bonds of like character required to be taken by courts of record of this Commonwealth.

History.
1971, Ex. Sess., c. 227.

Law Review.

For article analyzing rate-making issues under the SCC, see 14 Wm. & Mary L. Rev. 601 (1973).